North Carolina, session 2025, SB244.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-288.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-288.2. Riot; inciting to riot; punishments.
…
(c3) Any person who willfully engages in a riot is guilty of a Class F felony if, in the
course of the riot, the person attempts to overthrow the government of the United States, the State
of North Carolina, or any political subdivision thereof.
…
(e2) Any person who willfully incites or urges another to engage in a riot, and such inciting
or urging is a contributing cause of a riot in which a person attempts to overthrow the government
of the United States, the State of North Carolina, or any political subdivision thereof, shall be
punished as a Class F felon.
…."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
*S244-v-1*